Tennessee, session 114, SB1759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-1-126, is amended by adding a
new subsection (e):
(e) The department shall keep a copy of each validated risk and needs
assessment of each inmate under its supervision and control for the duration of the
inmate's period of incarceration.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1759
011325
- 1 -